Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [17.4595] THOROUGHBRED RACEHORSE RESIDENCY, AFTERCARE, AND BENEVOLENCE PILOT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Account" means the thoroughbred racehorse pilot program account established in subdivision 7. new text end new text begin (c) "Racetrack" means a class A racetrack that primarily conducts thoroughbred and quarter horse racing and is licensed by the Minnesota Racing Commission under chapter 240. new text end new text begin (d) "Racing day" and "racing season" have the meanings given in section 240.01. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of agriculture must establish and administer a thoroughbred racehorse residency, aftercare, and benevolence pilot program to stimulate the state's agricultural and equine industries and support the mental health and education of racetrack stable workers and their local communities. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Minnesota resident thoroughbred registry. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning in calendar year 2025, the commissioner of agriculture must compile and maintain a voluntary registry of thoroughbred racehorses that resided at a racetrack for at least 120 days during the previous calendar year. Once registered under this subdivision, a thoroughbred racehorse's registration does not expire. new text end new text begin (b) No later than February 15 each year, the owner of a thoroughbred racehorse seeking initial registration under this section must apply to the commissioner of agriculture in the form required by the commissioner. Each applicant must pay a nonrefundable application fee of $100 and demonstrate to the commissioner's satisfaction that the thoroughbred racehorse satisfied the residency requirement under paragraph (a) during the previous calendar year. The commissioner must deposit application fees collected under this subdivision in the account. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Residency awards. new text end new text begin (a) In calendar years 2026 and 2027, by the end of each racing day, a racetrack must award $750 to the current owner of a thoroughbred racehorse registered under this section if the registered thoroughbred racehorse started a race at the racetrack that racing day. new text end new text begin (b) No later than November 15, 2026, and November 15, 2027, the commissioner of agriculture must fully reimburse a racetrack for each award issued under paragraph (a) during the previous racing season. A racetrack must apply to the commissioner for reimbursement in the form required by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Repurposing grants. new text end new text begin Beginning in calendar year 2026, the commissioner of agriculture must award grants to national thoroughbred accredited organizations, organizations approved by the Minnesota Racing Commission, and college and university equine programs based in this state to provide retraining or repurposing services for retired thoroughbred racehorses registered under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Mental health and education grants. new text end new text begin Beginning in calendar year 2026, the commissioner of agriculture must award grants to organizations that develop or deliver mental health and educational services to the stable workers of a racetrack or to others in the racetrack's local community. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Account; appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) A thoroughbred racehorse pilot program account is established in the agricultural fund. new text end new text begin (b) Money in the account, including interest, is appropriated to the commissioner of agriculture for grants and residency awards under this section. Of the amount appropriated each year, the commissioner of agriculture must allocate at least $500,000 for repurposing grants under subdivision 5 and at least $500,000 for mental health and education grants under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (c) Application fee revenue collected by the commissioner of agriculture under subdivision 3 and deposited in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of agriculture for purposes of administering this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin This section expires July 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TRANSFER.new text end new text begin $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is transferred from the general fund to the thoroughbred racehorse pilot program account in the agricultural fund. This is a onetime transfer. new text end